Maine, session 132, LD283.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2009, c. 213, Pt. S, §3 and
affected by §16, is further amended to read:
3. Revenue-sharing funds. To strengthen the state-municipal fiscal relationship
pursuant to the findings and objectives of subsection 1, there is established the Local
Government Fund. To provide additional support for municipalities experiencing a higher-
than-average property tax burden, there is established the Disproportionate Tax Burden
Fund. To support municipalities that support the State's meals and lodging industries, there
is established the Local Government Hospitality Fund.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§4-C is enacted to read:
4-C. Distribution of Local Government Hospitality Fund. The Treasurer of State
shall transfer the balance in the Local Government Hospitality Fund on the 20th day of
each month. Money in the Local Government Hospitality Fund, as determined by
subsection 5, must be distributed to each municipality in which meals and lodging tax is
collected in proportion to the amount of meals and lodging tax collected by each
municipality.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. XXX, §1
and affected by §15, is further amended by enacting after the first blocked paragraph a new
blocked paragraph to read:
Beginning January 1, 2026, no later than the 10th day of each month, the State Controller
shall transfer to the Local Government Hospitality Fund 1% of the receipts during the
previous month from the taxes imposed under Title 36, section 1811, subsection 1,
paragraph D, subparagraphs (1) and (3) and credited to the General Fund without any
reduction, except that the postage, state cost allocation program and programming costs of
administering state-municipal revenue sharing may be paid by the Local Government
Hospitality Fund.